Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6215.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "cannabis licensee enforcement and appeals act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Administrative procedures act of 1969" means the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (b) "Appeals board" means the cannabis licensing appeals board created in section 5. (c) "Cannabis regulatory agency" means the marijuana regulatory agency created under Executive Reorganization Order No. 2019-2, MCL 333.27001, renamed the cannabis regulatory agency under Executive Reorganization Order No. 2022-1, MCL 333.27002. (d) "Licensee" means a person holding either of the following: (i) A state operating license issued under the medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27101 to 333.27801. (ii) A state license issued under the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967. (e) "Marihuana" means that term as defined in section 3 of the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27953. (f) "Marihuana acts" means both of the following: (i) The medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27101 to 333.27801. (ii) The Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967. (g) "Minor" means an individual who is less than 21 years of age. (h) "Rules" means the rules promulgated by the cannabis regulatory agency under the marihuana acts. (i) "Violation" means a violation of any of the following: (i) The marihuana acts. (ii) The rules. (iii) An order issued by the cannabis regulatory agency under the marihuana acts. Sec. 3. This act applies to all licensees and disciplinary or enforcement actions taken by the cannabis regulatory agency for a violation. This act is intended to implement and be consistent with all of the following: (a) Section 8(k) of the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27958(k). (b) Sections 303 and 407 of the medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27303 and 333.27407. Sec. 4. (1) The cannabis regulatory agency shall enforce compliance with the marihuana acts and rules through a graduated disciplinary system. A disciplinary action taken by the cannabis regulatory agency must be proportionate to the seriousness of a violation and the licensee's record of compliance, beginning with the least severe action reasonably necessary to address the violation and escalating only for an immediate public health or public safety based offense, an offense that could lead to illness or poisoning within the general public, an offense that implicates illegal activity, including a felony involving financial fraud, tax evasion, money laundering, or another serious financial crime, or a repeat violation. The cannabis regulatory agency shall include in each notice of disciplinary action that it issues to a licensee a statement that informs the licensee of the licensee's right to appeal to the appeals board under this act and the applicable deadline to submit an appeal to the appeals board under this act. (2) For a first-time violation that does not involve either of the following, the cannabis regulatory agency may issue a written citation or warning notice to the licensee but shall not, subject to subsections (3) and (8), impose a civil fine to the licensee or suspend the licensee's license: (a) An immediate risk to the public health, safety, or welfare, including, but not limited to, selling marihuana to a minor. (b) Marihuana that was not produced, distributed, or taxed in compliance with the marihuana acts, as applicable. (3) A citation or warning notice issued under subsection (2) must describe the violation and may require the licensee to take corrective action. The license shall keep a citation or warning notice issued under subsection (2) in the licensee's records for as long as the licensee holds a license. A citation or warning notice issued to a licensee under subsection (2) may be considered in determining sanctions for a subsequent violation by the licensee. In determining sanctions for a subsequent violation, the cannabis regulatory agency may consider prior violations or formal warnings if the prior incidents occurred within the preceding 2 years before the current violation. If a licensee fails to correct a violation within 30 calendar days after receiving a citation or warning notice issued under subsection (2), the cannabis regulatory agency may impose a civil fine. (4) The cannabis regulatory agency shall establish categories of violations. A subsequent violation falls in the same or similar category as a prior violation if it involves the same requirement or safeguard. As used in this subsection, "same" or "similar" means a violation of the same legal provision or a substantially related rule addressing the same subject matter or obligation as the prior offense. (5) Escalating a penalty based on a past incident requires that the prior citation or warning was formally recorded and communicated to the licensee. (6) If a violation is of a materially detrimental or flagrant nature and involves intentional misconduct or poses a risk to the public health, safety, or welfare, or if the licensee has previously been issued a citation or warning notice under subsection (2) for a violation within 1 calendar year from the date of the same or similar violation, the cannabis regulatory agency may impose a civil fine for the violation. (7) The cannabis regulatory agency shall include with each civil fine imposed under this section a notice of the violation and an explanation of the licensee's right to appeal under section 6. A civil fine imposed under this act must not exceed $5,000.00 against an individual and must not exceed $10,000.00 or an amount equal to the daily gross receipts, whichever is greater, against a licensee for each violation. The imposition of a civil fine is in addition to, and does not bar, any other lawful remedial measures or sanctions or penalties that apply to the same conduct, except that multiple fines are subject to section 8. (8) The cannabis regulatory agency may suspend a licensee's license if a licensee does either of the following: (a) Commits a violation that endangers the public health, safety, or welfare. (b) Exhibits a pattern of repeated violations that demonstrates an intentional, reckless, or negligent failure to comply with the marihuana acts, rules, or orders issued by the cannabis regulatory agency under the marihuana acts. (9) The cannabis regulatory agency may suspend a licensee's license under subsection (8) for a defined term or until specified conditions are met. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (10), the cannabis regulatory agency shall not impose a suspension without first issuing a formal complaint or notice to the licensee and providing an opportunity for a hearing or appeal in accordance with this act and the administrative procedures act of 1969. (10) If the cannabis regulatory agency determines that a licensee's continued operation poses an imminent threat to the public health, safety, or welfare, the cannabis regulatory agency may summarily suspend the licensee's license. The cannabis regulatory agency shall issue to the licensee, not later than 3 calendar days after making the determination, a written order that identifies the threat. A hearing must be promptly scheduled after the suspension to determine whether the suspension should remain in effect. The suspension remains in effect only for the duration of the threat, and the cannabis regulatory agency shall end the suspension immediately when the threat has been abated or adequately addressed by the licensee. (11) Subject to subsection (12), the cannabis regulatory agency may revoke a licensee's license for either of the following reasons: (a) The licensee commits an egregious violation, including, but not limited to, diverting marihuana to the illicit market, intentionally providing false information to the cannabis regulatory agency, the appeals board, or a law enforcement agency, operating while the licensee's license is suspended, or engaging in conduct that causes serious harm. (b) The licensee has a series of persistent violations that demonstrates that the licensee is unwilling or unable to comply with the marihuana acts and rules and to protect the public health, safety, and welfare. (12) The cannabis regulatory agency shall not revoke a license unless all of the following requirements have been met: (a) The cannabis regulatory agency has issued to the licensee a notice of the reasons for the revocation. (b) The cannabis regulatory agency has given the licensee an opportunity for a contested hearing or appeal under section 6. (c) A finding has been made that the revocation is warranted. (13) A licensee whose license has been revoked under this act and an individual who was an owner, officer, or director of or had a controlling interest in the licensee at the time of revocation are ineligible to apply for or hold a license under the marihuana acts for a period of 1 year from the date of revocation, or for a longer period if specified by the revocation order. (14) If a license is suspended under this act for a specified period or until certain conditions are met, the licensee and an individual who was an owner, officer, or director of or had a controlling interest in the licensee at the time of suspension are ineligible to apply for or be granted a new license for the duration of the suspension. (15) If a licensee holds multiple licenses under the marihuana acts, a suspension or revocation under this section may be limited to the specific license or facility where the violation occurred. The cannabis regulatory agency shall not suspend or revoke all licenses held by a licensee unless the cannabis regulatory agency determines, through substantial evidence, that the violation resulted from a systemic failure or willful noncompliance by the licensee across its operations. In such a case, the cannabis regulatory agency may impose corresponding sanctions on other licenses held by that licensee. (16) The graduated sanctions described in this section do not prohibit the cannabis regulatory agency from using other enforcement actions allowed under the marihuana acts or other laws. Sec. 5. (1) The cannabis licensing appeals board is created in the cannabis regulatory agency. The appeals board shall function independently of the cannabis regulatory agency's investigations and enforcement personnel. A member of the appeals board shall be impartial in reviewing a cannabis regulatory agency disciplinary action and must not have been directly involved in the investigation or issuance of the disciplinary action under appeal. At the time of appointment and during service on the appeals board, a member shall not be any of the following: (a) A licensee or an applicant for a license under the marihuana acts. (b) An owner, officer, director, manager, employee, agent, consultant, independent contractor, vendor, shareholder, or representative of a licensee or an applicant for a license under the marihuana acts. (c) A registered qualifying patient or a registered primary caregiver under the Michigan Medical Marihuana act, 2008 IL 1, MCL 333.26421 to 333.26430. (d) An individual with a direct or indirect financial interest in, or compensation arrangement with, a licensee or an applicant for a license under the marihuana acts. (2) The governor shall appoint the members of the appeals board with the advice and consent of the senate. The board must consist of 3 members that collectively represent expertise in administrative law, regulatory compliance, and the marihuana industry or small business operations. Not more than 2 members may be from the same political party. Before an individual is submitted to the senate for advice and consent under this subsection, the individual shall submit to the governor a signed written disclosure statement identifying any current relationship and any relationship during the preceding 5 years that the individual, or an immediate family member of the individual, has or had with a licensee or an applicant for a license under the marihuana acts, including any ownership interest, employment relationship, contractual relationship, vendor relationship, management role, representation, registered qualifying patient status, registered primary caregiver status under the Michigan Medical Marihuana act, 2008 IL 1, MCL 333.26421 to 333.26430, or other direct or indirect financial interest. The governor shall transmit the disclosure statement to the senate with the appointment request. (3) The governor shall appoint 1 of the first members to a 1-year term, 1 of the first members to a 2-year term, and 1 of the first members to a 3-year term. After the first appointments, the term of a member of the appeals board is 4 years or until a successor is appointed under subsection (2), whichever is later. The governor shall designate 1 member as the chairperson. (4) If a vacancy occurs on the appeals board, the governor shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term. (5) The governor may remove a member of the appeals board for incompetence; dereliction of duty; malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office; or any other good cause. As used in this subsection, "good cause" includes, but is not limited to, any of the following: (a) A violation of subsection (1). (b) A failure to submit, update, or correct a disclosure required under subsection (2). (c) A knowing omission or misrepresentation of a material fact in a disclosure required under subsection (2). (d) A conviction of, or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, tax evasion, money laundering, fraud, bribery, or another felony involving dishonesty or breach of public trust. (e) Participation in a matter in which the member, or an immediate family member of the member, has a prohibited conflict of interest under this section. (6) A member who becomes aware of a potential conflict of interest shall immediately disclose the conflict to the governor and the member shall not participate in the matter unless the governor determines that the matter does not involve a prohibited conflict of interest under this section. (7) The chairperson shall call the first meeting of the appeals board. At the first meeting, the appeals board shall elect officers that it considers necessary or appropriate. (8) Two of the members of the appeals board constitute a quorum for transacting business. A vote in favor by 2 of the members of the appeals board serving is required for any action of the appeals board. (9) The appeals board shall conduct its business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (10) A writing that is prepared, owned, used, possessed, or retained by the appeals board in performing an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (11) A member of the appeals board is entitled to compensation of $300.00 for each meeting of the appeals board attended by that member. The cannabis regulatory agency may reimburse a member for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving on the appeals board. (12) The appeals board shall do both of the following: (a) Conduct hearings regarding appeals of disciplinary actions taken by the cannabis regulatory agency against a licensee. (b) Issue determinations regarding the appeals described in subdivision (a). The board's determination must state the reasons for its conclusion. (13) The appeals board may do any of the following: (a) Affirm an action of the cannabis regulatory agency. (b) Modify a sanction of the cannabis regulatory agency. (c) Overturn a determination made by the cannabis regulatory agency that a violation occurred. (d) Remand a matter to the cannabis regulatory agency for further investigation or consideration of new evidence. Sec. 6. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), a licensee aggrieved by a disciplinary action of the cannabis regulatory agency may appeal the disciplinary action to the appeals board before the initiation or completion of a contested case proceeding under the administrative procedures act of 1969. To initiate an appeal, a licensee must submit a written appeal petition to the appeals board not later than 21 days after the licensee receives 1 of the following, as applicable: (a) Notice of the cannabis regulatory agency's disciplinary action. (b) A settlement offer under section 9. (2) If the notice of disciplinary action states that the alleged violation involves public health, public safety, or a serious financial violation, including tax evasion or money laundering, the licensee shall not appeal the disciplinary action to the appeals board under this section. A disciplinary action described in this subsection remains subject to a contested case hearing under the administrative procedures act of 1969 and judicial review as otherwise provided by law. (3) An appeal petition filed under subsection (2) must be accompanied by a filing fee of $500.00. However, the filing fee for a licensee that is participating in the cannabis regulatory agency's social equity program at the time the appeal petition is filed is $375.00. (4) Upon the submission of a petition with the appeals board under subsection (1), the cannabis regulatory agency's disciplinary action is stayed and the cannabis regulatory agency shall not enforce the disciplinary action until the appeal is resolved. However, for a summary suspension under section 4(10), the cannabis suspension remains in effect unless stayed by the appeals board or by the cannabis regulatory agency. A licensee may request expedited review by the appeals board of a summary suspension under section 4(8). (5) A licensee may file a written request for expedited review if delaying the appeal would cause specific harm or undue prejudice. The appeals board shall grant a request under any of the following situations: (a) A risk of significant economic harm to the business from waiting on the normal appeal timeline. (b) Substantial prejudice due to procedural delays not caused by the licensee. (c) Other time-sensitive business needs of the licensee that justify urgent consideration. (6) To initiate an expedited appeal, the licensee must submit a written request, with the appeal petition separately, clearly explaining the urgency. The request must detail the specific reasons why an expedited hearing is needed, including any evidence of impending economic losses, ongoing business hardship, or critical time constraints. (7) Not later than 5 business days after receiving a complete written request for expedited appeal, the cannabis regulatory agency or appeals board shall issue a decision granting or denying the request. (8) Upon granting expedited review, the appeals board shall conduct the appeal hearing without undue delay. (9) The appeals board shall schedule an appeal hearing or meeting to review the appeal that must take place as soon as practicable, but not later than 30 days after the appeals board receives the appeal petition, unless the licensee agrees to a later date. The appeals board may conduct appeal hearings informally and in a manner designed to be accessible to a licensee that elects not to be represented by a lawyer. A licensee has the right to be heard and to present written and oral evidence as to why the cannabis regulatory agency's disciplinary action was in error or why the cannabis regulatory agency's sanction is excessive or unwarranted. Cannabis regulatory agency staff involved in the decision may present their rationale and supporting evidence to the appeals board. The formal rules of evidence do not apply to an appeal hearing, but the appeals board may develop guidelines to ensure that the proceedings are fair and focused. A licensee may choose to have a lawyer or representative at an appeal hearing. A licensee must not be charged a fee other than the filing fee required under subsection (1) for submitting an appeal petition or for engaging in an appeal hearing. (10) After considering the evidence and arguments at an appeal hearing, the appeals board may affirm the cannabis regulatory agency's action, modify a sanction, overturn the cannabis regulatory agency's finding of a violation and dismiss the disciplinary action, or remand the matter to the cannabis regulatory agency for further investigation or consideration of new evidence. The appeals board shall issue a written order of the appeals board's decision, including the reasons for its decision, to the licensee and the cannabis regulatory agency. If the appeals board does not issue a decision within 45 days after the appeal hearing, the licensee may elect to treat the appeal as denied and request a contested case hearing under subsection (11) or may consent to allow additional time for the appeals board's decision. (11) The appeals board process is an optional, intermediary step before a contested case hearing is conducted under the administrative procedures act of 1969. A licensee's decision to appeal to the appeals board does not waive the licensee's right to a contested case hearing under the administrative procedures act of 1969. Not later than 21 days after receiving the appeals board's decision, the licensee may submit a written request to the cannabis regulatory agency for, or the cannabis regulatory agency may initiate on its own, a contested case hearing under the administrative procedures act of 1969. (12) If a contested case hearing is not requested or initiated within the time period described in subsection (11), the appeals board's decision is considered a final cannabis regulatory agency action for purposes of judicial review and enforcement. If, after the appeals board issues a written decision, a contested case hearing is conducted, the appeals board's decision is void. (13) If a licensee or the cannabis regulatory agency requests a contested case hearing under subsection (11), the hearing must be conducted by an administrative law judge as a contested case in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969. Upon conclusion of the contested case hearing, the administrative law judge shall prepare a proposal for decision containing findings of fact and conclusions of law. The proposal for decision must be transmitted to the appeals board. The appeals board shall review the proposal for decision and issue the final decision and final order of the cannabis regulatory agency. The appeals board's final order may adopt, reverse, or modify the proposal for decision in whole or in part and must include the appeals board's determination of any penalty or sanction. The appeals board's final order following a contested case hearing is subject to judicial review as provided by law. (14) If the licensee or cannabis regulatory agency does not request a contested case hearing under subsection (11), the appeals board's decision is final and binding on the licensee and the cannabis regulatory agency, and the cannabis regulatory agency shall take action consistent with the appeals board's decision. (15) The cannabis regulatory agency and the appeals board shall ensure that the appeal process established under this section is accessible to small businesses and social equity licensees. Forms, instructions, and guidance for filing an appeal must be written in plain language and made readily available. The cannabis regulatory agency shall publish or make available information on common reasons for appeals and examples, that have all identifying information redacted, of past appeal board decisions. Sec. 7. (1) A licensee that voluntarily reports to the cannabis regulatory agency that the licensee committed a violation is not subject to a civil fine for the violation if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The cannabis regulatory agency and any law enforcement authority was not aware of the violation and had not initiated an investigation into the matter before the licensee reported the violation. (b) The violation does not pose an imminent or direct risk to the public health, safety, or welfare and is a regulatory compliance issue of an administrative or technical nature, including, but not limited to, any of the following types of violations: (i) Inventory tracking discrepancies. (ii) Record-keeping errors. (iii) Minor security lapses that did not result in any harm. (c) The licensee discovers the violation on its own and, not later than 5 days after the discovery, or a longer period of time if justified by the circumstances, notifies the cannabis regulatory agency in writing of the violation. (d) The licensee's report to the cannabis regulatory agency is made in good faith, fully discloses the nature and scope of the violation, and includes, or is followed by a corrective action plan from the cannabis regulatory agency within 48 hours from report submission that includes, the steps taken or to be taken to remedy the violation and prevent its recurrence. (e) The licensee cooperates with any inquiry by the cannabis regulatory agency regarding the violation. (2) The cannabis regulatory agency may issue a written notice or warning that documents a violation described in subsection (1) only if the cannabis regulatory agency includes in the notice or warning a statement that the licensee reported the violation under subsection (1), and may require certain corrective actions or a period of compliance monitoring. If a licensee that submits a report under subsection (1) complies with an applicable corrective action plan, the cannabis regulatory agency shall not consider a notice or warning issued under this subsection to be a disciplinary action for purposes of determining prior violations. (3) If a licensee fails to comply with a corrective action plan described in subsection (2), or if the cannabis regulatory agency determines that the licensee was not fully truthful or withheld material information in the report that the licensee submitted under subsection (1), the licensee is subject to an applicable civil fine, and a record in the licensee's file for not more than 2 years, for the violation, and the cannabis regulatory agency may consider a notice or warning issued under subsection (2) to be a disciplinary action for purposes of determining prior violations. (4) The cannabis regulatory agency shall promulgate emergency rules in accordance with section 48 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, MCL 24.248, and develop and publish guidelines and a process for licensees to submit reports under subsection (1). The guidelines must encourage licensees to submit reports under subsection (1). The cannabis regulatory agency may provide training or resources to assist licensees in conducting self-audits and submitting reports under subsection (1). (5) A licensee's submission of a report under subsection (1) must not, by itself, be used in any criminal or civil proceeding as evidence of an intent to violate the law. If the licensee was truthful in its report and the public was not harmed as a result of the violation, the report must not be considered an admission against the licensee's interests in any other context. The cannabis regulatory agency may refer a report submitted under subsection (1) to a law enforcement agency only if the violation is of a nature that would have otherwise required the cannabis regulatory agency to report the violation to a law enforcement agency. Sec. 8. The cannabis regulatory agency shall not enforce more than 1 civil fine against a licensee for the same, continuous violation. The cannabis regulatory agency shall do both of the following: (a) Treat related violations as 1 violation for purposes of assessing sanctions and issue a single citation that addresses all relevant violations instead of issuing a separate citation for each violation. The cannabis regulatory agency may include multiple violations in a notice, but the violations must be consolidated and addressed together in 1 disciplinary action and resolved through 1 sanction or multiple sanctions that are imposed simultaneously. (b) Impose only 1 of the following: (i) A civil fine. (ii) A set of graduated sanctions for the violations. Sec. 9. (1) This act does not prohibit a licensee from engaging in a compliance conference or otherwise negotiating a settlement or consent order with the cannabis regulatory agency to resolve a violation or alleged violation without proceeding to a contested case hearing, if the conference or negotiations are otherwise allowed by law. The cannabis regulatory agency is encouraged to resolve matters through consent orders under the appropriate circumstances. A consent order is not effective unless it is approved by the director of the cannabis regulatory agency or director's designee. A consent order approved under this subsection is considered a final cannabis regulatory agency action for purposes of judicial review and enforcement. (2) In determining an appropriate settlement or consent order, the cannabis regulatory agency shall consider all mitigating factors that may warrant leniency and all aggravating factors that may warrant a stricter sanction. (3) Mitigating factors described in subsection (2) include, but are not limited to, any of the following: (a) The licensee's good-faith efforts to comply and cooperate with the marihuana laws, the rules, the cannabis regulatory agency, and law enforcement. (b) Whether the licensee reported the violation under section 7(1). (c) Whether the licensee has any previous violations or has not committed a violation not more than 1 calendar year from the date of the last violation. (d) Whether the licensee took corrective action upon discovering the violation and, if so, the extent of the corrective action. (e) Whether the violation was minor or technical in nature. (f) The extent of the effect of the violation on the public. (4) Aggravating factors described in subsection (2) include, but are not limited to, any of the following: (a) Repeated similar violations or a recent history of violations within the previous 180 calendar days. (b) Whether the licensee or the nature of the violation showed an intentional or reckless disregard of the law. (c) The severity of actual or potential harm caused by the violation. (d) Whether the licensee failed to cooperate with an investigation conducted under this act or the marihuana laws. (e) Whether the licensee attempted to conceal the violation. (5) If the cannabis regulatory agency makes a settlement offer or consent order proposal to a licensee to resolve 1 or more violations, the cannabis regulatory agency shall include with the offer a written explanation of the factors that the cannabis regulatory agency determined were relevant under subsections (3) and (4). (6) The cannabis regulatory agency shall develop and publish a nonexhaustive list of typical mitigating and aggravating factors that it considers under this section. The cannabis regulatory agency's disciplinary guidelines and sanction schedule must integrate these factors to guide cannabis regulatory agency staff in settlement negotiations. Sec. 10. The cannabis regulatory agency may promulgate rules under the administrative procedures act of 1969 to implement this act. Enacting section 1. This act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.